new_hnd_mo/without_Z_apertium_hn.dix
<pardef n="/mEM__p">
<e><p><l>mEM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mEM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mEMne</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mEMne</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJe</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJe</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJako</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJako</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJase</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJase</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJameM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJameM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJapara</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>muJapara</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hama</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hama</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamane</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamane</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hameM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hameM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamako</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamako</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamase</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamase</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamameM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamameM</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamapara</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamapara</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>mere_liye</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere_liye</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere_xvArA</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere_xvArA</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>merA</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>mere</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>merI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>hamAre_liye</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre_liye</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_liye"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre_xvArA</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre_xvArA</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke_xvArA"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>hamArA</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamAre</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>hamArI</l><r>mEM<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:Shashthi"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:u"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
</pardefs>

<e lm="mEM"><i></i><par n="/mEM__p"/></e>
